Oklahoma, session 2025, SB268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-10-411 of Title 27A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Biosolids” means solids separated from liquids during the


wastewater treatment process which are treated physically and


chemically to produce a semisolid, nutrient-rich product;



Req. No. 947 Page 1


2. “Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances” or “PFAS”


means non-polymeric perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances


that contain at least two sequential, fully fluorinated carbon


atoms, excluding gases and volatile liquids;


3. “Sewage sludge” means the residual, semi-solid material that


is produced as a byproduct of sewage by municipal, commercial, or


industrial wastewater treatment plants; and


4. “Septage” means a fluid mixture of untreated and partially


treated sewage solids, liquids, and sludge of human or domestic


origin, which is removed from a septic tank.


B. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as


provided in subsection C of this section, no person in this state


shall:


1. Apply to or spread on any land of this state:


a. sludge generated from a municipal, commercial, or


industrial wastewater treatment plant,


b. compost material that included in its production


sludge generated from a municipal, commercial, or


industrial wastewater treatment plant or septage, or


c. any other product or material that is intended for use


as a fertilizer, soil amendment, topsoil replacement,


mulch, or other similar agricultural purpose that is


derived from or contains sludge generated from a



Req. No. 947 Page 2


municipal, commercial, or industrial wastewater


treatment plant or septage; or


2. Sell or distribute in this state:


a. compost material that included in its production


sludge generated from a municipal, commercial, or


industrial wastewater treatment plant or septage, or


b. any other product or material that is intended for use


as a fertilizer, soil amendment, topsoil replacement,


mulch, or other similar agricultural purpose that is


derived from or contains sludge generated from a


municipal, commercial, or industrial wastewater


treatment plant or septage.


C. The prohibitions in subsection B of this section shall not


apply to:


1. The disposal or placement of materials described in


subsection B of this section at a lined and monitored solid waste


landfill;


2. The land application of or the sale or distribution of


compost material or other agricultural product derived from or


containing residuals generated as a result of the processing or


cultivation of food, food waste, crops, or vegetative material; the


brewing of malt liquor; the fermenting of wine or hard cider; or the


distilling of spirits, including, but not limited to, blueberries,


apples, grapes, potatoes, seaweed, fish and seafood, and spent grain

Req. No. 947 Page 3


or malt. Provided, the exemption under this subsection shall only


apply if the agricultural product is not cultivated in soil


previously treated with biosolids and that such product is not mixed


with sludge from a municipal, commercial, or industrial wastewater


treatment plant, septage, sewage, or sanitary wastewater prior to or


during land application or during the production of the agricultural


product;


3. The land application, sale, or distribution of compost


material or agricultural product or material derived from or


containing sludge resulting from the production of precipitated


calcium carbonate; and


4. The land application, sale, or distribution of compost


material or other agricultural product or material derived from or


containing manure from animals, zoos, or other agricultural sources.


D. The Department of Environmental Quality shall have


jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this section as they


pertain to land application or spreading of materials described


under this section. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food,


and Forestry shall have jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of


this section regarding agricultural materials. The Departments


shall enter into a memorandum of understanding to effectively


enforce the provisions of this section.





Req. No. 947 Page 4


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-10-412 of Title 27A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Department of Environmental Quality shall assess, study,


and develop a long-term plan for the purposes of prohibiting the


land application of septage in this state. The plan shall include,


but not be limited to:


1. Identification of the available capacity at wastewater


treatment plants or other treatment or disposal facilities in this


state to manage septage that is land-applied prior to the effective


date of this act;


2. Determination of the capacity anticipated to be necessary to


manage septage following the prohibition of land application in this


state;


3. Development of recommendations to support and fund


additional management capacity, if necessary; and


4. Development of recommendations concerning a framework for


the long-term prohibition of land application in this state.


B. The Department shall submit an electronic report to the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of


Representatives, the Governor, and the relevant legislative


committee chairs overseeing environment and natural resources not


later than February 1, 2026. The report shall include any suggested


legislative implementations resulting from the study.

Req. No. 947 Page 5


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-10-413 of Title 27A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry


shall develop a plan to protect agricultural producers who are


impacted by perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS)


contamination from the land application or spreading of:


1. Sludge generated from a municipal, commercial, or industrial


wastewater treatment plant;


2. Compost material that included in its production sludge


generated from a municipal, commercial, or industrial wastewater


treatment plant; or


3. Any other product or material that is intended for use as a


fertilizer, soil amendment, topsoil replacement, mulch, or other


similar agricultural purpose that is derived from or contains sludge


generated from a municipal, commercial, or industrial wastewater


treatment plant or septage.


B. The Department shall work directly with impacted


agricultural producers to identify sources of contamination and


institute best practices for immediate and successful PFAS removal,


remediation, and recovery, including any necessary surveys and


testing.


C. The Department shall submit a report to the Legislature on


the total cost of PFAS removal, remediation, and recovery under this

Req. No. 947 Page 6


section. Upon the convening of the next legislative session, the


reported amount shall be included in the general appropriations bill


for the upcoming fiscal year.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-947 RD 12/30/2024 7:55:45 PM































Req. No. 947 Page 7